Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1074
Lodge system; requirements.

(1) A society shall be deemed to be operating on the lodge system if it has a supreme governing body and subordinate lodges into which members are elected, initiated, or admitted in accordance with its laws, rules, and ritual. Subordinate lodges shall be required by the laws of the society to hold regular meetings at least once each month to further the purposes of the society.

(2) A society may, at its option, organize and operate lodges for children under the minimum age for adult membership. Membership and initiation in local lodges shall not be required of such children and such children shall not have a voice or vote in the management of the society.

Laws 1985, LB 508, § 3.